Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1013
Investment, defined.

Investment means
the value of qualified property incorporated into or used at the project.
For qualified property owned by the taxpayer, the value shall be the original
cost of the property. Investment does not include real property for a tourism
development project.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 13.